zh-TW: 硬體 > 燃料: 家用加熱油; 煤油; 丙烷
ro-RO: Feronerie > Combustibil: Ulei pentru încălzire locuință; Kerosen; Propan
nb: Maskinvare > Drivstoff: Fyrolje; Parafin; Propan
pt-PT: Equipamento > Combustível: Combustível de aquecimento doméstico; Querosene; Propano
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Gorivo: Domače kurilno olje; Kerozin; Propan
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Palivo: Lehký topný olej; Petrolej; Propan
pl: Sprzęt > Paliwo: Domowy olej opałowy; Nafta; Propan
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Kuras: Namų šildymo alyva; Žibalas; Propanas
sk-SK: Náradie > Palivo: Domový vykurovací olej; Petrolej; Propán
pt-BR: Ferragens > Combustível: Óleo para aquecedor doméstico; Querosene; Propano
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Καύσιμα: Πετρέλαιο θέρμανσης; Κηροζίνη; Προπάνιο
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Brandstof: Stookolie thuisgebruik; Kerosine; Propaan
vi: Phần cứng > Nhiên liệu: Dầu sưởi cho gia đình; Dầu hỏa; Propan
bg-BG: Железария > Гориво: Масло за горене; Керосин; Пропан
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 燃油: 家用燃料油; 煤油; 丙烷
tr: Hırdavat > Yakıt: Ev Isıtması Yakıtı; Kerosen; Propan
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Топливо: Топочный мазут; Керосин; Пропан
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เชื้อเพลิง: น้ำมันให้ความร้อนสำหรับใช้ในบ้าน; น้ำมันก๊าด; โพรเพน
fi: Rakentaminen > Polttoaine: Kodin lämmitysöljy; Kerosiini; Propaani
ko: 철물 > 연료: 가정용 난방유; 케러신; 프로페인
es: Bricolaje > Combustible: Aceite de calefacción para el hogar; Queroseno; Propano
en: Hardware > Fuel: Home Heating Oil; Kerosene; Propane
hu: Hardver > Üzemanyag: Otthoni fűtőolaj; Kerozin; Propán
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Treibstoff: Heizöl; Petroleum; Propan
sv: Metallprodukter > Bränsle: Villaolja; Fotogen; Propan
hr-HR: Željezarija > Gorivo: Lož ulje za domaćinstvo; Kerozin; Propan
da: Isenkram > Brændstof: Fyringsolie til privatbrug; Petroleum; Propan
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Carburante: Gasolio da riscaldamento domestico; Cherosene; Propano
fr: Quincaillerie > Carburant: Mazout de chauffage résidentiel; Kérosène; Propane
ja: DIY用品 > 燃料: 家庭用暖房オイル; 灯油; プロパン